Maryland, session 2025, SB0775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Workgroup to Study Implementation of a Statewide an Expanded
3–1–1 Nonemergency Telephone System.
(b) The Workgroup consists of the following members:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Emergency Management, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Executive Director of the Maryland 9–1–1 Board, or the Executive
Director’s designee;
(5) the Secretary of Information Technology, or the Secretary’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Aging, or the Secretary’s designee;
(7) the Secretary of Disabilities, or the Secretary’s designee;
(8) two representatives from a public safety answering point who reside in
a county or municipal corporation with access to 3–1–1 services, appointed by the Executive
Director of the Maryland Association of Counties;
(9) two representatives from a public safety answering point who reside in
a county or municipal corporation without access to 3–1–1 services, appointed by the
Executive Director of the Maryland Association of Counties;
– 1 –

Ch. 18 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(10) one representative from the telecommunications industry, appointed by
the Maryland 9–1–1 Board;
(11) one representative from the Maryland Association of Counties,
appointed by the Executive Director of the Association; and
(12) one representative from the Maryland Municipal League, appointed by
the Director of the League.
(c) The Secretary of Emergency Management Information Technology, or the
Secretary’s designee, shall chair the Workgroup.
(d) The Maryland Department of Emergency Management Information
Technology, with assistance from the Department of Legislative Services as necessary,
shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(e) A member of the Workgroup:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Workgroup; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Workgroup shall:
(1) review the study completed by the Department of Information
Technology required by Chapter 450 of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024 in order
to establish a plan to implement the recommendations of the study; and
(2) review the following areas for study and, if relevant, potential
modification or implementation:
(i) existing 3–1–1 services provided in the State;
(ii) 3–1–1 services provided in other states and jurisdictions;
(iii) best practices for providing a statewide an expanded 3–1–1
nonemergency telephone system;
(iv) solutions to any limitations or feasibility issues with providing a
statewide an expanded 3–1–1 nonemergency telephone system;
(v) the development of a plan to provide a statewide an expanded
3–1–1 nonemergency telephone system;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 18
(vi) identification of the appropriate State agency to oversee a
statewide an expanded 3–1–1 nonemergency telephone system; and
(vii) the development of a statewide an expanded virtual 3–1–1
portal.
(g) On or before November 1, 2025, the Workgroup shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2026, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, April 8, 2025.
– 3 –